apertium-es-ca.ca.dix
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>ríssiu</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>ríreu</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>rissis</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>rires</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>rissin</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>riren</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>rís</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>rira</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ertes</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>rides</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>erta</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>rida</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>erts</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>rits</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ert</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>rit</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rim</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>reixo</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>resc</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>risc</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>riu</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>reixes</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>rixes</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>reixen</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>rixen</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>reix</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>rix</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rim</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>risquem</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>reixi</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>resca</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>risca</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>riu</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>risqueu</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>reixis</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>risques</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>reixin</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>risquen</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>reixi</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>resca</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>risca</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="òb/rir__vblex">
    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>riguen</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>riguen</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>riga</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>riga</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>ric</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>riga</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>rigues</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>riguen</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>riga</l> 
        <r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

<e lm="obrir"><p><l>òb</l>                      <r>ob</r></p><par n="òb/rir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reobrir"><p><l>reòb</l>                    <r>reob</r></p><par n="òb/rir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="entreobrir"><p><l>entreòb</l><r>entreob</r></p><par n="òb/rir__vblex"/></e>
